Utah, session 2026, SB103.
Section 1. Section 53-3-105 is amended to read:53-3-105. Fees for licenses, renewals, extensions, reinstatements, rescheduling, and identification cards.Except as provided in Subsection (39), the following fees apply under this chapter:(1)An original class D license application under Section 53-3-205 is $52.(2)An original provisional license application for a class D license under Section 53-3-205 is $39.(3)An original limited term license application under Section 53-3-205 is $32.(4)An original application for a motorcycle endorsement under Section 53-3-205 is $18.(5)An original application for a taxicab endorsement under Section 53-3-205 is $14.(6)A learner permit application under Section 53-3-210.5 is $19.(7)A renewal of a class D license under Section 53-3-214 is $52 unless Subsection (12) applies.(8)A renewal of a provisional license application for a class D license under Section 53-3-214 is $52.(9)A renewal of a limited term license application under Section 53-3-214 is $32.(10)A renewal of a motorcycle endorsement under Section 53-3-214 is $18.(11)A renewal of a taxicab endorsement under Section 53-3-214 is $14.(12)A renewal of a class D license for an individual 65 and older under Section 53-3-214 is $27.(13)An extension of a class D license under Section 53-3-214 is $42 unless Subsection (17) applies.(14)An extension of a provisional license application for a class D license under Section 53-3-214 is $42.(15)An extension of a motorcycle endorsement under Section 53-3-214 is $18.(16)An extension of a taxicab endorsement under Section 53-3-214 is $14.(17)An extension of a class D license for an individual 65 and older under Section 53-3-214 is $22.(18)An original or renewal application for a commercial class A, B, or C license or an original or renewal of a provisional commercial class A or B license under Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, is $52.(19)A commercial class A, B, or C license skills test is $78.(20)Each original CDL endorsement for passengers, hazardous material, double or triple trailers, or tankers is $9.(21)An original CDL endorsement for a school bus under Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, is $9.(22)A renewal of a CDL endorsement under Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, is $9.(23)(a)A retake of a CDL knowledge test provided for in Section 53-3-205 is $26.(b)A retake of a CDL skills test provided for in Section 53-3-205 is $52.(24)A retake of a CDL endorsement test provided for in Section 53-3-205 is $9.(25)A duplicate class A, B, C, or D license certificate under Section 53-3-215 is $23.(26)(a)A license reinstatement application under Section 53-3-205 is $40.(b)A license reinstatement application under Section 53-3-205 for an alcohol, drug, or combination of alcohol and any drug-related offense is $45 in addition to the fee under Subsection (26)(a).(27)(a)An administrative fee for license reinstatement after an alcohol, drug, or combination of alcohol and any drug-related offense under Section 41-6a-520, 53-3-223, or 53-3-231 or an alcohol, drug, or combination of alcohol and any drug-related offense under Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, is $255.(b)This administrative fee is in addition to the fees under Subsection (26).(28)(a)An administrative fee for providing the driving record of a driver under Section 53-3-104 or 53-3-420 is $8.(b)The division may not charge for a report furnished under Section 53-3-104 to a municipal, county, state, or federal agency.(29)A rescheduling fee under Section 53-3-205 or 53-3-407 is $25.(30)(a)Except as provided under Subsections (30)(b) and (c), an identification card application under Section 53-3-808 is $23.(b)An identification card application under Section 53-3-808 for a person with a disability, as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12102, is $17.(c)A fee may not be charged for an identification card application if the individual applying:(i)(A)has not been issued a Utah driver license;(B)is indigent; and(C)is at least 18 years old; (ii)submits written verification that the individual is homeless, as defined in Section 26B-3-207, a person who is homeless, as defined in Section 35A-5-302, or a child or youth who is homeless, as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2), from:(A)a homeless shelter, as defined in Section 35A-16-305;(B)a permanent housing, permanent, supportive, or transitional facility, as defined in Section 35A-5-302;(C)the Department of Workforce Services; or(D)a homeless service provider as verified by the Department of Workforce Services as described in Section 26B-8-113; or(D)(E)a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii); or(iii)is under 26 years old and submits written verification that the individual:(A)is in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services; or(B)was in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services but is no longer in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services due to the individual's age.(31)(a)An extension of a regular identification card under Subsection 53-3-807(4) for a person with a disability, as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12102, is $17.(b)The fee described in Subsection (31)(a) is waived if the applicant submits written verification that the individual is homeless, as defined in Section 26B-3-207, or a person who is homeless, as defined in Section 35A-5-302, or a child or youth who is homeless, as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2), from:(i)a homeless shelter, as defined in Section 35A-16-305;(ii)a permanent housing, permanent, supportive, or transitional facility, as defined in Section 35A-5-302;(iii)the Department of Workforce Services;(iv)a homeless service provider as verified by the Department of Workforce Services as described in Section 26B-8-113; or(v)a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii).(32)(a)An extension of a regular identification card under Subsection 53-3-807(5) is $23.(b)The fee described in Subsection (32)(a) is waived if the applicant submits written verification that the individual is homeless, as defined in Section 26B-3-207, or a person who is homeless, as defined in Section 35A-5-302, from:(i)a homeless shelter, as defined in Section 35A-16-305;(ii)a permanent housing, permanent, supportive, or transitional facility, as defined in Section 35A-5-302;(iii)the Department of Workforce Services; or(iv)a homeless service provider as verified by the Department of Workforce Services as described in Section 26B-8-113.; or(v)a local education agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii).(33)In addition to any license application fees collected under this chapter, the division shall impose on individuals submitting fingerprints in accordance with Section 53-3-205.5 the fees that the Bureau of Criminal Identification is authorized to collect for the services the Bureau of Criminal Identification provides under Section 53-3-205.5.(34)An original mobility vehicle permit application under Section 41-6a-1118 is $30.(35)A renewal of a mobility vehicle permit under Section 41-6a-1118 is $30.(36)A duplicate mobility vehicle permit under Section 41-6a-1118 is $12.(37)An original driving privilege card application under Section 53-3-207 is $32.(38)A renewal of a driving privilege card application under Section 53-3-207 is $23.(39)A fee may not be charged for an original class D license application, original provisional license application for a class D license, or a learner permit application if the individual applying is:(a)(i)is under the 26 years old; and(b)(ii)submits written verification that the individual:(i)(A)is in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services; or(ii)(B)was in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services but is no longer in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services due to the individual's age.; or(b)submits written verification that the individual is homeless, as defined in Section 26B-3-207, or is a person who is homeless, as defined in Section 35A-5-302, or a child or youth who is homeless, as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2), from:(i)a homeless shelter, as defined in Section 35A-16-305;(ii)a permanent housing, permanent supportive, or transitional facility, as defined in Section 35A-5-302;(iii)the Department of Workforce Services;(iv)a homeless service provider as verified by the Department of Workforce Services as described in Section 26B-8-113; or(v)a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii).(40)An administrative fee to add an interdicted person identifier to a license certificate under Section 53-3-236 or identification card under Section 53-3-805 is $7.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.